Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2511
Signature sheet, defined.

Signature sheet shall mean a sheet of paper which is part of a petition and which is signed by persons wishing to support the petition effort.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 11.